Connecticut, session 2026, HB05505.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section: (1)
"Commercial warehouse" means any building or structure that (A)
exceeds twenty-five thousand square feet, and (B) is primarily designed
for, or has previously been used for, the importation, storage or
distribution of goods in commerce, (2) "municipality" has the same
meaning as provided in section 7-148 of the general statutes, and (3)
"person" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148hh of the
general statutes.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any municipal charter,
ordinance, regulation or resolution, any special act or any provision of
the general statutes, no person shall use, operate or permit the use of a
commercial warehouse to house or provide shelter to any individual for
a period exceeding twenty-four hours without first obtaining a permit
from the municipality in which such warehouse is located. A
municipality shall designate an officer or board of the municipality to
review any permit application and issue any such permit pursuant to
the provisions of this section.
(2) The officer or board designated by the municipality shall hold a
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5505
public hearing on any permit application submitted pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection and approve or deny the application
not later than one hundred eighty business days after the submission of
such application. Any such permit applicant shall deliver notice of the
permit application, by certified or registered mail, to each person
appearing of record as an owner of property that abuts the property
upon which the commercial warehouse proposed for use or operation
as housing or shelter is located. Such notice shall be given not later than
three business days after the submission of any permit application
pursuant to this subdivision.
(c) No officer or board designated by the municipality pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section shall issue a permit pursuant to this section
unless the applicant demonstrates that each individual to be housed or
sheltered in the commercial warehouse shall have continuous access to:
(1) Sanitary restroom and shower facilities;
(2) Potable drinking water;
(3) Sleeping accommodations, including a bed, cot or elevated
sleeping surface with clean bedding materials, and adequate space to
maintain health and safety;
(4) Sufficient heating and cooling systems to maintain a comfortable
indoor temperature; and
(5) Storage sufficient to secure personal belongings.
(d) No commercial warehouse shall be used or operated as housing
or shelter pursuant to this section unless such commercial warehouse:
(1) Complies with the requirements of the State Building Code, Fire
Prevention Code, Fire Safety Code and Public Health Code applicable
to public lodging accommodations; and
(2) Provides not less than two hundred square feet of space inside
such warehouse for each individual housed or sheltered in such
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5505
warehouse.
(e) Following the issuance of a permit pursuant to this section, the
municipality may require that the permit holder provide written
evidence of compliance with this section as long as the commercial
warehouse remains in use or operation as housing or shelter. Evidence
of compliance may be obtained through an inspection of such
warehouse by the municipality, including by the zoning enforcement
officer, any public health official or any code official employed by the
municipality.
(f) The officer or board designated by the municipality pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section may revoke or suspend a permit issued
pursuant to this section if the permit holder violates any provision of
this section.
(g) A municipality may, by vote of its legislative body or, in a
municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting, by vote of
the board of selectmen, prohibit the issuance of permits for the use or
operation of a commercial warehouse as housing or shelter.
(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the use or
operation of a commercial warehouse as housing or shelter (1) in
connection with a declaration of an emergency or a major disaster by
the Governor pursuant to title 28 of the general statutes, (2) for use as a
temporary warming or cooling shelter, (3) if such warehouse has been
converted into a residential property pursuant to section 8-2t of the
general statutes, or (4) if such commercial warehouse was in use as
housing or shelter on or before the effective date of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (g), "the issuance of" was added after "prohibit", for clarity.
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5505
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4